Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1997.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2887, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 260, O.S.L. 2023 (68 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 2887), is amended to read as follows:


Section 2887. The following property shall be exempt from ad


valorem taxation:


1. All property of the United States, and such property as may


be exempt by reason of treaty stipulations existing at statehood


between the Indians and the United States government, or by reason


of federal laws in effect at statehood, during the time such


treaties or federal laws are in force and effect. In instances


where a federal agency has obtained title to property through

Req. No. 3095 Page 1


foreclosure, voluntary or involuntary liquidation or bankruptcy,


which was previously subject to ad valorem taxation, the property


may continue to be assessed for ad valorem taxes if such federal


agency has agreed to pay such taxes;


2. All property of this state, and of the counties, school


districts, and municipalities of this state, including property


acquired for the use of such entities pursuant to the terms of a


lease-purchase agreement which provides for the passage of title or


the release of security interest, if applicable, upon payment of all


rental payments and an additional nominal amount;


3. All property of any college or school, provided such


property is devoted exclusively and directly to the appropriate


objects of such college or school within this state and all property


used exclusively for nonprofit schools and colleges;


4. The books, papers, furniture and scientific or other


apparatus pertaining to any institution, college or society referred


to in paragraph 3 of this section, and devoted exclusively and


directly for the purpose above contemplated, and the like property


of students in any such institution or college, while such property


is used for the purpose of their education;


5. All fraternal orphan homes and other orphan homes;


6. All property used for free public libraries, free museums,


public cemeteries, or free public schools;



Req. No. 3095 Page 2


7. All property used exclusively and directly for fraternal or


religious purposes within this state. For purposes of this


paragraph, an exemption based on religious purposes includes real


property owned by a church which allows its premises to be used by


an entity if such entity is not required to make rental payments to


the church, is not required to execute a formal lease agreement with


respect to its occupancy of the church premises and conducts


instruction of children from any or all grades for ages preschool


through twelfth grade, including religious instruction consistent


with the doctrines of the church the premises of which are being


used for that purpose. For purposes of this paragraph, a


requirement by a church to be reimbursed by the entity for utility


expenses, janitorial services or similar expenses shall not be a


basis upon which to remove or deny the exempt status of church


property. Exempt status of church property shall not be removed nor


shall church property be allocated between taxable and exempt status


based on the use of church premises by an entity as described by


this paragraph.


For purposes of administering the exemption authorized by this


section and in order to determine whether a single family


residential property is used exclusively and directly for fraternal


or religious purposes, the fair cash value of a single family


residential property, for which an exemption is claimed as


authorized by this subsection section, in excess of Five Hundred

Req. No. 3095 Page 3


Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) for the applicable assessment year


shall not be exempt from taxation;


8. All property of any charitable institution organized or


chartered under the laws of this state as a nonprofit or charitable


institution, provided the net income from such property is used


exclusively within this state for charitable purposes and no part of


such income inures to the benefit of any private stockholder,


including property which is not leased or rented to any person other


than a governmental body, a charitable institution or a member of


the general public who is authorized to be a tenant in property


owned by a charitable institution under Section 501(c)(3) of the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and which includes, but


is not limited to, an institution that either:


a. additionally satisfies the income standards set forth


in Internal Revenue Service Revenue Procedure 96-32,


which may be audited by the county assessor of the


applicable county, in addition to other requirements


of this subparagraph, as a condition of obtaining and


maintaining the exemption, if:


(1) the property provides residential rental


accommodations regardless of whether services or


meals are provided, and


(2) the property:



Req. No. 3095 Page 4


(a) is occupied as of the applicable January 1


assessment date if the structure is a


single-family dwelling, or


(b) has an average seventy-five percent (75%)


occupancy rate, based upon the total number


of units suitable for occupancy, during the


calendar year preceding the applicable


January 1 assessment date if the property


contains multiple structures suitable for


multi-family multifamily housing. The owner


of any property subject to the occupancy


requirements prescribed herein shall submit


a report to the county assessor of the


county in which the property is located no


later than December 15 each year regarding


the occupancy rate for the preceding eleven


(11) months. If the report indicates that


the average occupancy rate was less than


seventy-five percent (75%), the county


assessor shall determine the taxable value


of the property for the succeeding


assessment year and the property shall not


be exempt for any subsequent assessment year


unless the average occupancy rate is at

Req. No. 3095 Page 5


least seventy-five percent (75%) during the


succeeding eleven-month period. Except as


provided in Section 178.6 of Title 60 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, no asset consisting of a


single-family or multi-family multifamily


dwelling unit owned by an entity the


property of which would otherwise be exempt


pursuant to this subparagraph a of this


paragraph shall be exempt from ad valorem


taxation if any such dwelling unit was


improved with or acquired with any portion


of proceeds from the sale of obligations


issued by any entity organized pursuant to


Section 176 of Title 60 of the Oklahoma


Statutes if the interest income derived from


such obligations is exempt from federal


income tax, or


b. (1) for a facility constructed prior to January 1,


2006, is a continuum of care retirement community


providing housing for the aged, licensed under


Oklahoma law, owned by a nonprofit entity


recognized by the Internal Revenue Service as a


Section 501(c)(3) tax-exempt entity and located


in a county with a population of more than five

Req. No. 3095 Page 6


hundred thousand (500,000) according to the


latest Federal Decennial Census, and


(2) (a) for a facility in which construction was


completed on or after January 1, 2006, is:


i. a continuum of care retirement


community providing housing for the


aged, licensed under Oklahoma law,


ii. owned by a nonprofit entity recognized


by the Internal Revenue Service as a


Section 501(c)(3) tax-exempt entity,


and


iii. located in any county of the state


regardless of population, or


(b) for a facility other than a facility


described by division (1) of this


subparagraph b of this paragraph and which


is partially or fully constructed prior to


January 1, 2006, is:


i. owned and occupied on or after January


1, 2006, by an entity that operates a


continuum of care retirement community


providing housing for the aged,


licensed under Oklahoma law,



Req. No. 3095 Page 7


ii. owned by a nonprofit entity recognized


by the Internal Revenue Service as a


Section 501(c)(3) tax-exempt entity,


and


iii. is located in any county of the state


regardless of population;


9. All property used exclusively and directly for charitable


purposes within this state, provided the charity using said such


property does not pay any rent or remuneration to the owner thereof


unless the owner is a charitable institution described in Section


501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C., Section


501(c)(3), or a veterans’ organization described in Section


501(c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C., Section


501(c)(19);


10. All property of any hospital established, organized and


operated by any person, partnership, association, organization,


trust, or corporation, as a nonprofit and charitable hospital,


provided the property and net income from such hospital are used


directly, solely, and exclusively within this state for charitable


purposes and that no part of such income shall inure to the benefit


of any individual, person, partner, shareholder, or stockholder, and


provided further that such hospital facilities shall be open to the


public without discrimination as to race, color or creed and


regardless of ability to pay, and that such hospital is licensed and

Req. No. 3095 Page 8


otherwise complies with the laws of this state relating to the


licensing and regulation of hospitals;


11. All libraries and office equipment of ministers of the


Gospel actively engaged in ministerial work in the State of Oklahoma


this state, where said such libraries and office equipment are being


used by said such ministers in their ministerial work, shall be


deemed to be used exclusively for religious purposes and are


declared to be within the meaning of the term “religious purposes”


as used in Article X, Section 6 of Article X of the Oklahoma


Constitution of the State of Oklahoma;


12. Household goods, tools, implements and livestock of every


person maintaining a home, not exceeding One Hundred Dollars


($100.00) in value or One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) in value if


Article X, Section 6 of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution


provides for an exemption in such amount; and in addition thereto,


there shall be exempt from taxation on personal property the further


sum of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) to all enlisted and


commissioned personnel, whether on active duty or honorably


discharged, who served in the Armed Forces of the United States


during:


a. the Spanish-American War,


b. the period beginning on April 6, 1917, and ending on


July 2, 1921,



Req. No. 3095 Page 9


c. the period beginning on December 6, 1941, and ending


on such date as the state of national emergency as


declared by the President of the United States shall


cease to exist December 31, 1946, or


d. any other or future period during which a state of


national emergency shall have been or shall be


declared to exist by the Congress or the President of


the United States.


All surviving spouses made so by the death of such enlisted or


commissioned personnel, who are bona fide residents of this state,


shall be entitled to the above additional exemption provided in this


paragraph;


13. Family portraits;


14. All food and fuel provided in kind for the use of the


family not to exceed provisions for one (1) year’s time, and all


grain and forage necessary to maintain for one (1) year the


livestock used to provide food for the family. No person from whom


pay is received or expected for board shall be considered a member


of the family within the intent and meaning of this paragraph;


15. All growing crops; and


16. All game animals, fowl and reptile, which are not being


grown for food or sale and which are kept exclusively for


propagation or exhibition, in private grounds or public parks in


this state; and

Req. No. 3095 Page 10


17. Tangible personal property owned by a business entity and


used in the operation of a business if the total fair cash value of


all such property owned by the business entity within this state


does not exceed Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) in the


applicable tax year. For the purposes of this paragraph:


a. the total fair cash value shall be determined before


the application of any depreciation schedules and


shall include all taxable tangible personal property


otherwise subject to ad valorem taxation,


b. a business entity claiming the exemption provided by


this paragraph shall not be required to file a


tangible personal property rendition form if the


county assessor determines the exemption applies based


upon information reasonably available to the assessor,


and


c. the exemption provided by this paragraph shall apply


per business entity, regardless of the number of


locations operated by the business entity within the


state.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective January 1, 2027.




60-2-3095 QD 1/15/2026 9:40:59 AM





Req. No. 3095 Page 11